Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,103
Commissioner; city representative; required; when.

The governing body of any city other than a city of the metropolitan class in which a housing agency has been or may be created may appoint one of its members to serve as one of the five commissioners of such housing agency for such term as the governing body may determine. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Housing Agency Act, it shall not be considered a conflict of interest if such person so appointed as a commissioner votes on any matter involving the city. If the governing body of the city intends that a commissioner's appointment is made with the intention that such commissioner represent the city, then his or her certificate of appointment shall so state. If any such commissioner so appointed and designated ceases to serve as a member of the governing body of a city, then his or her term of office shall automatically terminate and a successor shall be appointed to fill the vacancy in the manner provided in sections 71-1594 to 71-15,105.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 32;

Laws 2018, LB399, § 5.
July 19, 2018